Utah statutes.
59-1-1004.   Installment payments.

(1)  The commission may enter into agreements with taxpayers on installment payments of taxes, penalties, and interest.  The commission may revise, accelerate, or cancel the installment agreement if any of the following occurs:

(a)  the commission determines that the financial condition of the taxpayer has substantially changed;

(b)  the commission determines that the taxpayer provided inaccurate information concerning his financial condition; or

(c)  the taxpayer fails to make timely payments pursuant to the terms of the installment agreement.

(2)  The commission shall give the taxpayer reasonable notice of its intent to revise or cancel an installment agreement entered into under this section.

